Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7,113
Health carrier or utilization review organization; step-therapy protocol; clinical review criteria.

A health carrier or utilization review organization shall consider available recognized evidence-based and peer-reviewed clinical practice guidelines when establishing a step-therapy protocol. Upon written request of a covered person, a health carrier or utilization review organization shall provide any clinical review criteria applicable to a specific prescription drug covered by the health carrier or utilization review organization.

Laws 2021, LB337, § 3.